Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.250

Collection of unpaid penalties, assessments, and debts—Use of collection agencies.

Except as otherwise specified by law, the director or his or her designee has the authority to retain collection agencies licensed under chapter 19.16 RCW for the purposes of collecting unpaid penalties, assessments, and other debts owed to the department.

The director or his or her designee may also collect as costs moneys paid to the collection agency as charges, or in the case of credit cards or financial instruments, such as checks returned for nonpayment, moneys paid to financial institutions.

[ 1995 c 374 s 62.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.